Utah statutes.
13-42-136.   Violation of Consumer Sales Practices Act.

If an act or practice of a provider violates both this chapter and Chapter 11, Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act, an individual may not recover under both for the same act or practice.



Enacted by Chapter 154, 2006 General Session

